Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 4 Soil Conservation
2-4-18.
Coastal resources management council and water resources board unaffected.

The provisions of this chapter notwithstanding, no provision of this chapter shall be construed to take precedence over or acquire any of the powers delegated to the coastal resources management council under the provisions of §

46-23-6

and any amendment to these sections and this section shall also apply to the state water resources board.

History of Section.
P.L. 1972, ch. 173, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 2, § 36.

2-4-19.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of any provision to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of the chapter, and the application of that provision to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected by that invalidity.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-4-18

; P.L. 1972, ch. 173, § 2.

2-4-20.
Repealed.

History of Section. P.L. 1979, ch. 353, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

2-4-20

; Repealed by P.L. 1986, ch. 97, § 1, effective June 10, 1986.